Tennessee, session 114, SB2466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-146(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(9) Enters a cargo container and removes merchandise.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2466
012084
- 1 -